Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.440

Staff to aid in purchasing, poverty programs, parks, emergency services, budget, etc., authorized.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The board of county commissioners of the several counties may employ such staff as deemed appropriate to serve the several boards directly in matters including but not limited to purchasing, poverty and relief programs, parks and recreation, emergency services, budgetary preparations set forth in RCW 36.40.010-36.40.050, code enforcement and general administrative coordination. Such authority shall in no way infringe upon or relieve the county auditor of responsibilities contained in RCW *36.22.010(9) and 36.22.020.

[1974 ex.s. c 171 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 252 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 36.22.010 was amended by 1984 c 128 s 2, changing subsection (9) to subsection (8); and was subsequently amended by 1995 c 194 s 1, changing subsection (8) to subsection (6).